apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="afdro/gen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogden</l>     <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogde</l>      <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogde</l>      <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogde</l>      <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gend</l>      <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogt</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogt</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dro/gen#_af__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogt</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogden</l>     <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogde</l>      <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogde</l>      <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogde</l>      <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogt</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ogt</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gen</l>       <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ge</l>        <r>gen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="afkal/ven__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>ven</l>       <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ven</l>       <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fden</l>      <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fde</l>       <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fde</l>       <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fde</l>       <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vend</l>      <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ven</l>       <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>f</l>         <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ven</l>       <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>ven<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="afklem/men__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mend</l>      <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>men</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="afdrogen">        <i>afdro</i><par n="afdro/gen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afdrogen">        <p><l>dro</l>       <r>afdro</r></p><par n="dro/gen#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>af</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="afkalven">        <i>afkal</i><par n="afkal/ven__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afklemmen">       <i>afklem</i><par n="afklem/men__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afremmen">        <i>afrem</i><par n="afklem/men__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afstammen">       <i>afstam</i><par n="afklem/men__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afstemmen">       <i>afstem</i><par n="afklem/men__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="instemmen">       <i>instem</i><par n="afklem/men__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="overeenstemmen">  <i>overeenstem</i><par n="afklem/men__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="toestemmen">      <i>toestem</i><par n="afklem/men__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="uitdrogen">       <i>uitdro</i><par n="afdro/gen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="uitdrogen">       <p><l>dro</l>       <r>uitdro</r></p><par n="dro/gen#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>uit</l><r></r></p></e>
